Hawaii statutes.
§660-3 Issuable by whom. The supreme
court, the justices thereof, and the circuit courts may issue writs of habeas
corpus in cases in which persons are unlawfully restrained of their liberty;
provided that persons committed or detained by order of the family court or
under chapter 334 may, and if the jurisdiction of the family court is
exclusive, shall, prosecute their applications in the family court. [L 1870, c
32, §32; am L 1893-4, c 75, §1; am L 1903, c 79, §3; RL 1925, §2727; RL 1935,
§4312; RL 1945, §10353; RL 1955, §239-3; HRS §660-3; am L 1972, c 90, §5(a)]

Cross References

See §602-5.

Exclusive jurisdiction of family court, in what cases, see
§§571-11 and 571-14.

Case Notes

Constitutional right to counsel does not apply to habeas
corpus proceedings. 51 H. 318, 459 P.2d 376 (1969).

Defendant who alleges that defendant pleaded guilty because
of prior coerced confession is not, without more, entitled to hearing on
petition for habeas corpus. 53 H. 274, 492 P.2d 953 (1972).

Without a special reason appellate court will not exercise
its original jurisdiction in habeas corpus proceedings when relief is available
in a lower court. 57 H. 411, 557 P.2d 787 (1976).

Writ sought on behalf of certain persons. Attache of foreign
legation. 1 H. 353 (1856).

Deserting seamen. 2 H. 112 (1858); 6 H. 704 (1888).

Fugitives held for extradition. 5 H. 573 (1886); 20 H. 319
(1910); 21 H. 526 (1913); 48 H. 508, 405 P.2d 309 (1965).

Insane persons. 3 U.S.D.C. Haw. 404 (1909); 19 H. 346
(1909); 19 H. 576 (1909).

Lepers. 2 U.S.D.C. Haw. 227 (1905); 19 H. 218 (1908).

Minors. 29 H. 830 (1927); 31 H. 328 (1930); 32 H. 731
(1933); 33 H. 106 (1934).

Persons detained on shipboard. 3 H. 503 (1873).

For relief against cruel and unusual punishment. 31 H. 982
(1931).

As means of enforcing foreign decree awarding custody of
children. 49 H. 20, 407 P.2d 885 (1965).

Relief from commitment may be had on habeas corpus. Under
statute authorizing arrest of debtors about to abscond. 1 H. 340 (1856); 6 H.
633 (1886).

Relief from commitment for alleged contempt. 13 H. 575
(1901); 18 H. 670 (1907); 44 H. 271, 353 P.2d 631 (1960).

No release of persons convicted and restrained by virtue of
judgment unless judgment is void. 211 U.S. 146 (1908); 3 U.S.D.C. Haw. 502
(1910); 7 H. 95 (1887); 13 H. 102 (1900); 15 H. 276 (1903); 17 H. 338 (1906);
20 H. 120 (1910); 25 H. 414, 417 (1920).

Form of mittimus. Failure to completely describe the offense
in the mittimus not ground for issuance of writ where record shows valid
sentence. 6 H. 343 (1882); 7 H. 95 (1887).

A mittimus correct in form and substance is a good defense to
a claim of illegal imprisonment. 18 H. 500 (1907).

Where mittimus of magistrate exceeded jurisdiction in
imposition of fine in addition to imprisonment held separable and valid as to
imprisonment. 23 H. 766 (1917).

Sentence must be void on its face in order to entitle
convicted person to release on habeas corpus. 2 H. 444 (1861); 9 H. 131
(1893); 10 H. 610 (1897); 17 H. 487 (1906). See 6 H. 664 (1887); 7 H. 42
(1887). Habeas corpus raises question only of jurisdiction. 34 H. 484 (1938).

Cases of illegal sentence. 3 H. 17 (1866); 6 H. 732 (1869);
7 H. 162 (1887); 38 H. 479 (1950). Magistrate having no criminal jurisdiction
over subject matter, prisoner discharged on writ. 6 H. 25 (1870). Release
from commitment under void order. 44 H. 271, 353 P.2d 631 (1960).

In contempt cases the only question to be inquired into is
that of jurisdiction. 1 H. 95 (1852); 11 H. 594 (1898); 14 H. 245 (1902); 19
H. 88 (1908); 29 H. 323 (1926).

Habeas corpus cannot be used as a substitute for appeal. 10
H. 610 (1897); 27 H. 237 (1923). Nor to correct errors. 25 H. 414, 417
(1920). Nor to relitigate issues litigated to final appellate determination.
39 H. 167 (1951), aff'd 209 F.2d 75 (1953).

Where court has jurisdiction of the subject matter of a
criminal complaint and the person of the defendant, habeas corpus does not lie
to review the sufficiency of the complaint. 27 H. 237 (1923).

Appeal lies. 13 H. 534 (1901); 13 H. 575 (1901).
Supersedeas. 19 H. 346 (1909); 26 H. 701 (1923).

Writ suspended when martial law declared in the 1895
rebellion. 10 H. 29 (1895). Under proclamation of December 7, 1941, see note
to §67 of Organic Act.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next